Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-449
Restoration of rights, privileges, property.

All rights, privileges, and property affected by an executed part of a court-martial sentence which has been set aside or disapproved, except an executed dismissal or discharge, shall be restored unless a new trial or rehearing is ordered and such executed part is included in a sentence imposed upon the new trial or rehearing.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 49, p. 1574.